Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 6. Survivors' Benefits

§ 35-9-161.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 91, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2005, ch. 248, § 1, related to the free tuition and fees for education of survivors of deceased firefighters.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 91, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2007.

§ 35-9-162.
Fire training facility; oversight.

The state fire marshal is authorized to purchase on behalf of the state the state fire training academy facility in Riverton. The state fire marshal shall be responsible for all transaction costs involved in the purchase. The state fire marshal is authorized to operate the facility thereafter.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 99, § 1.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 99, § 2, provides:

“(a) There is appropriated six hundred fifty-seven thousand one hundred forty-eight dollars ($657,148.00) from the general fund to the state fire marshal for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008 for purposes of this act.

“(b) The state fire marshal is authorized three (3) additional full-time equivalent positions to administer the fire training academy facility. There is appropriated two hundred forty-two thousand seventy dollars ($242,070.00) from the general fund to fund these positions for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 99, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 35-9-163.
Enforcement of building codes; application of building codes to specific uses.

Except as provided in this article for any county or municipality requesting and granted local enforcement authority pursuant to W.S.

35-9-121

, no state or local official authorized to enforce the provisions of this article shall interpret or enforce any building codes or standards adopted by the state or local governmental entity in a way that is more stringent or burdensome than required by the standards or codes.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, short term rental of detached one (1) and two (2) family dwellings and townhomes shall not be regulated as a commercial use for purposes of fire, building and electrical standards and shall not be subject to regulation under the International Building Code.

History.

2015 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 149, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.